Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1829
Real property taxes; redemption from sale; extension of time by second sale.

If any purchaser of real property sold for taxes under sections 77-1801 to 77-1860 suffers the same to be again sold for taxes before the expiration of the last day of the second annual sale thereafter, such purchaser shall not be entitled to a deed for such real property until the expiration of a like term from the date of the second sale, during which time the real property shall be subject to redemption upon the terms and conditions prescribed by law. This section shall not apply to real property determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section 77-1837.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 213, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 6541;

C.S.1922, § 6069;

Laws 1925, c. 168, § 2, p. 442;

C.S.1929, § 77-2021;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 29, p. 659;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 29, p. 446;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 29, p. 629;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2021;

R.S.1943, § 77-1829;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 155;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 128;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 26.